Utah statutes.
34-29-2.   License -- Duty of cities, towns and counties to issue and
regulate.
Every city, town and county shall by ordinance provide for the issuing of
licenses as contemplated by this chapter and shall establish such rules and
regulations as are not herein provided for the carrying on of the business or
occupation for which such license may be issued.
